Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,150
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Economic Development shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Site and Building
Development Act.

Laws 2011, LB388, § 7;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 15.